Illinois, session 104th, HB3665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Rights of Crime Victims and Witnesses Act 5is amended by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 120/4)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1404)7    Sec. 4. Rights of crime victims. 8    (a) Crime victims shall have the following rights:9        (1) The right to be treated with fairness and respect 10    for their dignity and privacy and to be free from 11    harassment, intimidation, and abuse throughout the 12    criminal justice process.13        (1.5) The right to notice and to a hearing before a 14    court ruling on a request for access to any of the victim's 15    records, information, or communications which are 16    privileged or confidential by law. 17        (1.6) Except as otherwise provided in Section 9.5 of 18    the Criminal Identification Act or Section 3-3013 of the 19    Counties Code, whenever a person's DNA profile is 20    collected due to the person being a victim of a crime, as 21    identified by law enforcement, that specific profile 22    collected in conjunction with that criminal investigation 23    shall not be entered into any DNA database. Nothing in   HB3665- 2 -LRB104 11293 RLC 21379 b1    this paragraph (1.6) shall be interpreted to contradict 2    rules and regulations developed by the Federal Bureau of 3    Investigation relating to the National DNA Index System or 4    Combined DNA Index System. 5        (2) The right to timely notification of all court 6    proceedings.7        (3) The right to communicate with the prosecution.8        (4) The right to be heard at any post-arraignment 9    court proceeding in which a right of the victim is at issue 10    and any court proceeding involving a post-arraignment 11    release decision, plea, or sentencing.12        (5) The right to be notified of the conviction, the 13    sentence, the imprisonment and the release of the accused.14        (6) The right to the timely disposition of the case 15    following the arrest of the accused.16        (7) The right to be reasonably protected from the 17    accused through the criminal justice process.18        (7.5) The right to have the safety of the victim and 19    the victim's family considered in determining whether to 20    release the defendant and setting conditions of release 21    after arrest and conviction. 22        (8) The right to be present at the trial and all other 23    court proceedings on the same basis as the accused, unless 24    the victim is to testify and the court determines that the 25    victim's testimony would be materially affected if the 26    victim hears other testimony at the trial.  HB3665- 3 -LRB104 11293 RLC 21379 b1        (9) The right to have present at all court 2    proceedings, including proceedings under the Juvenile 3    Court Act of 1987, subject to the rules of evidence, an 4    advocate and other support person of the victim's choice.5        (10) The right to restitution.6    (b) Any law enforcement agency that investigates an 7offense committed in this State shall provide a crime victim 8with a written statement and explanation of the rights of 9crime victims under this amendatory Act of the 99th General 10Assembly within 48 hours of law enforcement's initial contact 11with a victim. The statement shall include information about 12crime victim compensation, including how to contact the Office 13of the Illinois Attorney General to file a claim, and 14appropriate referrals to local and State programs that provide 15victim services. The content of the statement shall be 16provided to law enforcement by the Attorney General. Law 17enforcement shall also provide a crime victim with a sign-off 18sheet that the victim shall sign and date as an 19acknowledgement that he or she has been furnished with 20information and an explanation of the rights of crime victims 21and compensation set forth in this Act, including the ability 22to file a complaint against an individual who is licensed by 23the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation.24    (b-5) Upon the request of the victim, the law enforcement 25agency having jurisdiction shall provide a free copy of the 26police report concerning the victim's incident, as soon as   HB3665- 4 -LRB104 11293 RLC 21379 b1practicable, but in no event later than 5 business days from 2the request. 3    (c) The Clerk of the Circuit Court shall post the rights of 4crime victims set forth in Article I, Section 8.1(a) of the 5Illinois Constitution and subsection (a) of this Section 6within 3 feet of the door to any courtroom where criminal 7proceedings are conducted. The clerk may also post the rights 8in other locations in the courthouse.9    (d) At any point, the victim has the right to retain a 10victim's attorney who may be present during all stages of any 11interview, investigation, or other interaction with 12representatives of the criminal justice system. Treatment of 13the victim should not be affected or altered in any way as a 14result of the victim's decision to exercise this right. 15(Source: P.A. 103-792, eff. 1-1-25.)